Tennessee, session 114, HB2295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2027, the department of health shall submit a
report on the feasibility of creating and implementing a graduate physician licensure program
that would allow a person who has graduated from an allopathic medical school and passed the
United States Medical Licensing Examination, but who has not completed an accredited
postgraduate residency program, to provide medical services within a framework of a
continuous collaboration and supervision agreement with a licensed physician to the chair of the
health and welfare committee of the senate and the chair of the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over health-related matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2295
012602
- 1 -